Missouri, session 2026, SB1369.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 304, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 304.039, to read as
follows:
304.039. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Lane filtering", driving a motorcycle, as defined
in section 301.010, between rows of stopped or slow-moving
vehicles that are traveling in the same direction as the
motorcycle on divided or undivided streets, roads, or
highways;
(2) "Lane splitting", driving a motorcycle, as defined
in section 301.010, between rows of fast-moving vehicles
that are traveling in the same direction as the motorcycle
on divided or undivided streets, roads, or highways.
2. An operator of a motorcycle may overtake and pass
vehicles in the same lane occupied by a vehicle being
overtaken, or between the lanes of two vehicles being
overtaken, so long as the operator of the motorcycle is
traveling at a rate of speed not more than ten miles per

SB 1369 2
hour over the speed of traffic flow and not more than twenty-
five miles per hour.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
authorizing lane splitting.
4. Any operator of a motor vehicle who intentionally
impedes or attempts to prevent any operator of a motorcycle
from operating his or her motorcycle as permitted under this
section shall be guilty of an infraction.
5. The Missouri state highway patrol may develop
educational guidelines relating to lane filtering in a
manner that would ensure the safety of the motorcycle
operator and the drivers and passengers of the surrounding
vehicles.
✓